Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-807
Formation of district; petition granted; interested person; appeal; procedure.

Any interested person, firm, or corporation may likewise appeal from a decision of the board granting the petition, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1949, c. 196, § 6(2), p. 575;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 41;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 112.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.